California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(i) A recommendation as to whether to seek the support of adjacent counties for projects that have intercounty impact by requesting the board of supervisors and the city selection committee of each of the adjacent counties to develop a county transportation expenditure plan for their respective county. Adjacent counties shall endeavor to work cooperatively together to develop mutual traffic and transportation projects identified in their respective county transportation expenditure plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 173, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

131052.

The recommended county transportation expenditure plan shall be subject to a public hearing and then to a review by the commission, before submittal to the board of supervisors and local governments for adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131053.

The commission shall, within 45 days after receipt of a draft county transportation expenditure plan forwarded pursuant to Section 131052, approve the draft plan unless one or more of the following findings is made:

(a) There would be a significant negative regional impact as a result of the proposed projects.

(b) There are insufficient funds available to implement the proposed projects. 

(c) Conflicts exist within the county transportation
 expenditure plan.

(d) The estimates of proceeds from any proposed retail transactions and use tax ordinance are not reasonable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131054.

If the commission rejects a draft county transportation expenditure plan because the draft plan fails to meet the requirements set forth in Section 131053, the commission shall return the draft plan to the county for amendments before resubmittal to the commission for review.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131055.

If the commission approves a draft county transportation expenditure plan, the commission shall return the draft plan to the board of supervisors for its approval and to local governments for their approval. A majority of the board of supervisors, and a majority of the local governments representing a majority of the population of the county in the incorporated areas by a majority vote of their respective councils, are required for the adoption of the draft county expenditure plan. The adopted county transportation expenditure plan shall be published by the county within 30 days after its adoption.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131056.

(a) Not less than one year prior to the date of the last general election in which a retail transactions and use tax ordinance is in effect pursuant to this division, the commission or the county transportation authority administering the adopted county expenditure transportation plan shall prepare a new draft county transportation expenditure plan for approval pursuant to this chapter. 

(b) Upon approval of the draft plan, the board of supervisors shall submit, at the next primary or general election, the question of whether the ordinance shall
 remain in effect to fund the approved plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131057.

(a) The commission and any county transportation authority, in administering the adopted county transportation expenditure plan and imposing the retail transactions and use tax, shall have only those powers necessary for those purposes.

(b) The San Mateo County Transportation Authority shall have the power to administer funds transferred to it by the San Mateo County Transit District, consistent with the expenditure plan for a voter-approved tax imposed by the San
 Mateo County Transit District pursuant to Section 103350.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 231, Sec. 2.   (AB 1613)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Retail Transactions and Use Tax [131100. - 131122.]

131100.

(a) The Legislature, by the enactment of this chapter intends a county transportation authority or the commission, pursuant to a county transportation expenditure plan adopted pursuant to Section 131055, to use any additional funds provided by this chapter to supplement existing local revenues being used for public transportation purposes listed in the plan. The Legislature further intends that the funds provided pursuant to this chapter shall not replace funds previously provided by property tax revenues for public transportation purposes. The nine-county San Francisco Bay area is further encouraged to maintain its existing commitment of local funds for public transportation purposes.

(b) Any tax revenue generated pursuant to this chapter shall be expended in the county of origin, except that tax revenue generated may be expended within and outside the county of origin if so provided in the adopted county transportation expenditure plan. However, the tax revenues may be exchanged for federal or state funds available to another county or local government for transportation purposes if the exchange will benefit the county of origin.

(c) (1) In order to receive funds from the Counties of Alameda and Contra Costa and the City and County of San Francisco pursuant to this chapter, the San Francisco Bay Area Rapid Transit District shall agree to match from federal, state, or other funds available to the district, at least as much as it receives from the additional funds provided by this chapter from those counties.

(2) The funds the district received pursuant to this chapter, and its matching funds therefor, shall be used only for capital expenditures.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 83, Sec. 2.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

131101.

All allocations of revenues derived from the adoption of a retail transactions and use tax ordinance in a county shall be consistent with the priorities established by its county transportation expenditure plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131102.

(a) (1) A retail transactions and use tax ordinance for a tax of either one-half of 1 percent or 1 percent applicable in the incorporated and unincorporated territory of a county, except as provided in paragraph (2), may be imposed by a county transportation authority or the commission in the manner prescribed in Section 131103 and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, if two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure vote to approve its imposition at an election which shall be called for this purpose by the board of supervisors within one year after the adoption of a county transportation expenditure plan.

(2) The authority to impose a tax under paragraph (1) shall apply to the incorporated
 and unincorporated territory of the County of San Mateo and the City and County of San Francisco only until December 31, 2025. The elimination of the authority pursuant to this paragraph to impose a tax shall not affect the validity or operation of a tax approved before December 31, 2025, in the incorporated and unincorporated territory of the County of San Mateo or the City and County of San Francisco pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) Commencing January 1, 2026, a retail transactions and use tax ordinance for a tax of 18 of 1 percent or multiple thereof, up to 1 percent, applicable in the territory of the City and County of San Francisco may be imposed by the county transportation authority or the commission in the manner prescribed in Section 131103 and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, if
 two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure vote to approve its imposition at an election which shall be called for this purpose by the board of supervisors within one year after the adoption of a county transportation expenditure plan. The combined rate of taxes in the territory of the City and County of San Francisco imposed pursuant to this subdivision and paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not exceed 1 percent.

(c) Commencing January 1, 2026, a retail transactions and use tax ordinance for a tax of 18 of 1 percent or multiple thereof, up to 1 percent, applicable in the incorporated and unincorporated territory of the County of San Mateo may be imposed by the county transportation authority or the commission in the manner prescribed in Section 131103 and Part 1.6 (commencing with Section 7251) of Division 2 of the Revenue and
 Taxation Code, if two-thirds of the electors voting on the measure vote to approve its imposition at an election which shall be called for this purpose by the board of supervisors within one year after the adoption of a county transportation expenditure plan. The combined rate of taxes in the incorporated and unincorporated territory of the County of San Mateo imposed pursuant to this subdivision and paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) shall not exceed 1 percent.

(d) The ordinance shall take effect at the close of the polls on the day of the election at which the proposition, as set forth in Section 131108, is adopted. The ordinance shall specify the period, as determined by the adopted county transportation expenditure plan during which the tax will be imposed. The tax may be terminated earlier if the projects in the adopted plan are completed and any bonds outstanding issued pursuant to this division are
 redeemed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 740, Sec. 5.   (SB 63)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

131103.

The county, in the retail transactions and use tax ordinance, shall state the nature of the tax to be imposed and shall specify the purposes for which the revenues derived from the tax will be used, and may state the membership of the county transportation authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 83, Sec. 3.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

131104.

(a) The county shall conduct the election called by the board of supervisors pursuant to Section 131102, and the county shall bear the cost in conducting the election, but shall be reimbursed from the proceeds of the tax by the agency imposing the tax if the tax is approved pursuant to Section 131102.

(b) The election shall be called and conducted in the same manner as provided by law for the conduct of elections by a county.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131105.

(a) Any tax ordinance adopted pursuant to this chapter shall be operative on the first day of the first calendar quarter commencing more than 120 days after adoption of the ordinance.

(b) Prior to the operative date of the ordinance, a county transportation authority or the commission, as the case may be, shall contract with the State Board of Equalization to perform all functions incident to the administration and operation of the ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131106.

The net revenues derived from the taxes imposed pursuant to this chapter, after deduction for expenses pursuant to Section 131107, shall be allocated by the agency imposing the tax for the transportation purposes as set forth in the adopted county transportation expenditure plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131107.

In an adopted county transportation expenditure plan that provides for the imposition of a retail transactions and use tax, not more than 1 percent of the annual net amount of revenues raised by the tax may be used to fund the salaries and benefits of the staff of the commission or the county transportation authority, as the case may be, in administering the plan and the retail transactions and use tax ordinance.

All other funds, after reimbursement to the county for the cost of conducting the election as provided for in Section 131104, shall be used for the planning, design, construction, and operation of the traffic and transportation projects as set forth in the adopted plan, and shall be allocated according to eligible sponsoring agencies.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131108.

(a) The board of supervisors, as part of the ballot proposition to approve the imposition of a retail transactions and use tax, may seek authorization to issue bonds as may be provided for in the adopted county transportation expenditure plan payable solely from the proceeds of the tax.

(b) The maximum bonded indebtedness which may be authorized shall be an amount equal to the sum of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds, but not to exceed the estimated proceeds of the tax, as determined by the plan.

(c) The proposition shall set forth the actual percent of the tax.

(d) The proposition shall set forth the duration of the tax if the plan specifies a time limit.

(e) The proposition shall set forth the amount of bonds, if any, payable from the proceeds of the tax.

(f) The proposition shall set forth either a county transportation authority or the commission as the agency imposing the tax.

(g) For an entity formed after 1978 which does not have an appropriations limit, the proposition shall include a limit pursuant to Article XIIIB of the Constitution.

(h) The sample ballot to be mailed to the voters, pursuant to Section 13303 of the Elections Code, shall be the full proposition, as set forth in the ordinance calling the election, and the voter information handbook shall include the entire adopted county transportation expenditure plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 923, Sec. 214.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

131109.

(a) The bonds authorized by the voters concurrently with the approval of the retail transactions and use tax may be issued at any time by the agency imposing the tax and shall be payable solely from the proceeds of the tax. The bonds shall be referred to as “limited tax bonds.”

(b) The pledge of the tax to the limited tax bonds authorized under this chapter shall have priority over the use of any of the tax for “pay-as-you-go” financing, except to the extent that that priority is expressly restricted in the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131110.

Limited tax bonds shall be issued pursuant to a resolution adopted at any time of a two-thirds vote by the agency imposing the retail transactions and use tax. Each resolution shall provide for the issuance of bonds in the amounts as may be necessary, until the full amount of bonds authorized have been issued. The full amount of bonds may be divided into two or more series and different dates of payment fixed for the bonds of each series. A bond need not mature on its anniversary date.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131111.

(a) A resolution authorizing the issuance of bonds shall state all of the following:

(1) The purposes for which the proposed debt is to be incurred, which may include all costs and estimated costs incidental to, or connected with, the accomplishment of those purposes, including, without limitation, engineering, inspection, legal, fiscal agents, financial consultant and other fees, bond and other reserve funds, working capital, bond interest estimated to accrue during the construction period and for a period not to exceed three years thereafter, and expenses of all proceedings for the authorization, issuance, and sale of the bonds.

(2) The estimated cost of accomplishing those purposes.

(3) The amount of the principal of the indebtedness.

(4) The maximum term the bonds proposed to be issued shall run before maturity, which shall not be beyond the date of termination of the imposition of the retail transactions and use tax.

(5) The maximum rate of interest to be paid, which shall not exceed the maximum allowable by law.

(6) The denomination or denominations of the bonds, which shall not be less than five thousand dollars ($5,000).

(7) The form of the bonds, including, without limitation, registered bonds and coupon bonds, to the extent permitted by federal law, and the form of any coupons to be attached thereto, the registration, conversion, and exchange privileges, if any, pertaining thereto, and the time when all of, or any part of, the principal becomes due and payable.

(b) The resolution may also contain any other matters authorized by this chapter or any other law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131112.

The bonds shall bear interest at a rate or rates not exceeding the maximum allowable by law, payable semiannually, except that the first interest payable on the bonds, or any series thereof, may be for any period not exceeding one year, as determined by the agency imposing the retail transactions and use tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131113.

In the resolution authorizing the issuance of the bonds, the agency imposing the retail transactions and use tax may also provide for the call and redemption of the bonds prior to maturity at the times and prices and upon other terms as specified. However, no bond is subject to call or redemption prior to maturity, unless it contains a recital to that effect or unless a statement to that effect is printed.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131114.

The principal of, and interest on, the bonds shall be payable in lawful money of the United States at the office of the treasurer of the agency imposing the retail transactions and use tax, or at other places as may be designated, or at both the office and other places at the option of the holders of the bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131115.

The bonds, or each series thereof, shall be dated and numbered consecutively and shall be signed by the chairperson or vice chairperson of the agency imposing the retail transactions and use tax and the auditor-controller of the agency, and the official seal, if any, of the agency shall be attached.

The interest coupons of the bonds shall be signed by the auditor-controller of the agency. All of the signatures and seal may be printed, lithographed, or mechanically reproduced, except that one of the signatures shall be manually affixed.

If any officer whose signature appears on the bonds or coupons ceases to be that officer before the delivery of the bonds, the officer’s signature is as effective as if the officer had remained in office.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131116.

The bonds may be sold as the agency imposing the retail transactions and use tax determines by resolution, and the bonds may be sold at a price below par, whether by negotiated or public sale.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131117.

Delivery of any bonds may be made at any place either inside or outside the state, and the purchase price may be received in cash or bank credits.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131118.

All accrued interest and premiums received on the sale of the bonds shall be placed in the fund to be used for the payment of the principal of, and interest on, the bonds, and the remainder of the proceeds of the bonds shall be placed in the treasury of the agency imposing the retail transactions and use tax and applied to secure the bonds or for the purposes for which the debt was incurred. However, when the purposes have been accomplished, any money remaining shall be either (a) transferred to the fund to be used for the payment of principal of, and interest on, the bonds or (b) placed in a fund to be used for the purchase of the outstanding bonds in the open market at prices and in the manner, either at public or private sale or otherwise, as determined by the agency. Bonds so purchased shall be canceled immediately.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131119.

(a) The agency imposing the retail transactions and use tax may provide for the issuance, sale, or exchange of refunding bonds to redeem or retire any bonds issued by the agency upon the terms, at the times and in the manner which it determines.

(b) Refunding bonds may be issued in a principal amount sufficient to pay all, or any part of, the principal of the outstanding bonds, the premiums, if any, due upon call and redemption thereof prior to maturity, all expenses of the refunding, and either of the following:

(1) The interest upon the refunding bonds from the date of sale thereof to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded out of the proceeds of the sale of the refunding bonds or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holders of the bonds.

(2) The interest upon the bonds to be refunded from the date of sale of the refunding bonds to the date of payment of the bonds to be refunded or to the date upon which the bonds to be refunded will be paid pursuant to call or agreement with the holder of the bonds.

(c) The provisions of this chapter for the issuance and sale of bonds apply to the issuance and sale of refunding bonds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131120.

(a) The agency imposing the retail transactions and use tax may borrow money in anticipation of the sale of bonds which have been authorized pursuant to this chapter, but which have not been sold or delivered, and may issue negotiable bond anticipation notes therefor and may renew the bond anticipation notes from time to time. However, the maximum maturity of any bond anticipation notes, including the renewals thereof, shall not exceed five years from the date of delivery of the original bond anticipation notes.

(b) The bond anticipation notes, and the interest thereon, may be paid from any money of the agency available therefor, including the revenues from the tax. If not previously otherwise paid, the bond anticipation notes, or any portion thereof, or the interest thereon, shall be paid from the proceeds of the next sale of the bonds of the agency in anticipation of which the notes were issued.

(c) The bond anticipation notes shall not be issued in any amount in excess of the aggregate amount of the bonds which the agency has been authorized to issue, less the amount of any bonds of the authorized issue previously sold, and also less the amount of other bond anticipation notes therefor issued and then outstanding. The bond anticipation notes shall be issued and sold in the same manner as the bonds.

(d) The bond anticipation notes and the resolutions authorizing them may contain any provisions, conditions, or limitations which a resolution of the agency may contain.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131121.

Any bonds issued under this chapter are legal investment for all trust funds; for the funds of insurance companies, commercial and savings banks, and trust companies; and for state school funds; and whenever any money or funds may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be invested in bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state, that money or funds may be invested in the bonds issued under this chapter, and whenever bonds of cities, counties, school districts, or other districts within the state may, by any law now or hereafter enacted, be used as security for the performance of any act or the deposit of any public money, the bonds issued under this chapter may be so used. The provisions of this chapter are in addition to all other laws relating to legal investments and shall be controlling as the latest expression of the Legislature with respect thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131122.

Any action or proceedings wherein the validity of the adoption of the retail transactions and use tax ordinance provided for in this chapter or the issuance of any bonds thereunder or any of the proceedings in relation thereto is contested, questioned, or denied, shall be commenced within six months from the date of the election at which the ordinance is approved; otherwise, the bonds and all proceedings in relation thereto, including the adoption and approval of the ordinance, shall be held to be valid and in every respect legal and incontestable.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Metropolitan Transportation Commission Administration of Adopted County Transportation Expenditure Plan [131200. - 131203.]

131200.

Upon approval of a retail transactions and use tax at an election conducted pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 131100) in a county with an adopted county transportation expenditure plan that provides that the commission shall administer the tax, the commission shall do all of the following:

(a) Appoint an advisory committee, as provided in the plan, whose members shall be compensated at the rate of fifty dollars ($50) for attending meetings of the advisory committee, but not to exceed one hundred dollars ($100) in any month, and necessary traveling and personal expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties as authorized by the commission. Members of the staff of the commission, as determined by the commission, shall be available to assist the advisory committee in its work.

(b) Do any and all things necessary to carry out purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131201.

The commission, with the advice of the advisory committee, shall determine the allocation of the net revenues derived from the imposition of the retail transactions and use tax in conformance with the adopted county transportation expenditure plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131202.

The commission shall prepare and adopt an annual report by January 1 of each year on the progress to achieve the objectives of completion of the projects in each county transportation expenditure plan that is administered by the commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131203.

Any amendment to a county transportation expenditure plan proposed by the commission is subject to approval by the advisory committee. An amendment which adds or deletes a project, or is of major significance, shall be submitted for approval in the same manner the adopted plan was approved pursuant to Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 131050). Amendments may provide for the use of additional federal, state, and local funds to account for unexpected revenue fluctuations or to take into consideration unforeseen circumstances. Any amendment shall take into account that all appropriate actions shall be taken to give highest priority to the projects in the initial plan, and any amendments shall not delay or delete any project in the initial plan without the approval of the project sponsor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. County Transportation Authority [131240. - 131304.]



  ARTICLE 1. Creation of a County Transportation Authority [131240. - 131242.]

131240.

Upon approval of a retail transactions and use tax at an election conducted pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 131100) in a county with an adopted county transportation expenditure plan that includes a provision for the creation of a county transportation authority, the authority shall be created at that election.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131241.

(a) The county transportation authority shall consist of the members who are elected officials as specified in the county transportation expenditure plan or in the retail transactions and use tax ordinance, and shall be appointed by each constituent local government within 45 days after the authority is created.

(b) At the first meeting of the county transportation authority, one-half of the members, and the odd-numbered member if the membership of the county transportation authority is odd-numbered, shall be selected by lot to serve terms consisting of the remaining months of the current calendar year, if any, plus two years, and the remaining members shall be selected by lot to serve a term consisting of the remaining months of the current calendar year, if any, plus three years. Thereafter, appointments for all members shall be for two-year terms, beginning on January 1.

(c) If any member or alternate member ceases to be an elected official, that member shall cease to be a member of the county transportation authority, and another member shall be appointed for the remainder of the term by the constituent local government that that member represents.

(d) An alternate may be designated for each regular member. A regular member who, pursuant to the county transportation expenditure plan, serves by virtue of holding a specified public office, may designate a person to serve as his or her alternate. In the case of any other regular member, the appointing constituent local government may designate an alternate to the regular appointed member. The alternate’s term of office shall be the same as that of the regular member. When the regular member is not present at the meeting of the authority, the alternate may act as the regular member and shall have all the rights, privileges, and responsibilities of the regular member.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 83, Sec. 4.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

131242.

The Secretary of Transportation shall convene the initial meeting of the county transportation authority at the county seat, within 90 days after the authority is created.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 352, Sec. 509.   (AB 1317)   Effective September 26, 2013.   Operative July 1, 2013, by Sec. 543 of Ch. 352.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [131260. - 131269.]

131260.

A county transportation authority at its first meeting, and thereafter, after the first complete calendar year, annually at the first meeting in January, shall elect a chairperson who shall preside at all meetings, and a vice chairperson who shall preside in his or her absence. In the event of their absence or inability to act, the members present, by an order entered in the minutes, shall select one of their members to act as chairperson pro tempore, who, while so acting, shall have the authority of the chairperson.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131262.

The majority of the members of a county transportation authority constitutes a quorum for the transaction of business, and all official acts of the authority require the affirmative vote of a majority of the members of the authority.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131263.

The acts of a county transportation authority shall be expressed by motion, resolution, or ordinance.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131264.

All meetings of a county transportation authority shall be conducted in the manner prescribed by the Ralph M. Brown Act (Chapter 9 (commencing with Section 54950) of Part 1 of Division 2 of Title 5 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131265.

A county transportation authority shall do all of the following:

(a) Adopt an annual budget and fix the compensation of its officers and employees.

(b) Adopt an administrative code, by ordinance, which prescribes the powers and duties of its officers, the method of appointment of its employees, and its methods, procedures, and systems of operation and management.

(c) Cause a post audit of its financial transactions and records at least annually by a certified public accountant.

(d) Appoint an advisory committee, which membership reflects a board spectrum of interests and geographic areas of the county. Members of the staff of the county transportation authority, as determined by the county transportation authority, shall be available to aid the advisory committee in its work.

(e) Appoint other advisory committees that it deems necessary.

(f) Do any and all things necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131266.

Notice of the time and place of the public hearing for the adoption of the annual budget of a county transportation authority shall be published pursuant to Section 6061 of the Government Code, and shall be published not later than the 15th day prior to the date of the hearing.

The proposed annual budget shall be available for public inspection at least 15 days prior to the hearing.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131267.

A county transportation authority may appoint officers that it deems necessary to carry out its duties and functions.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131268.

Each member of a county transportation authority shall be compensated at the rate of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day attending the business of the authority, but not to exceed four hundred dollars ($400) in any month, and necessary traveling and personal expenses incurred in the performance of his or her duties as authorized by the county transportation authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

131269.

A county transportation authority may enter into a contract with the Board of Administration of the Public Employees’ Retirement System, and the board may enter into the contract to include all of the employees of the county transportation authority in that retirement system. The employees may be entitled to the same health benefits as are state employees pursuant to Part 5 (commencing with Section 22750) of Division 5 of Title 2 of the Government Code or any other retirement system that the authority determines is in the best interest of its employees.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 69, Sec. 38.   Effective June 24, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Powers and Functions [131280. - 131286.]

131280.

A county transportation authority shall close its affairs and be terminated within 180 days after the completion of the projects listed in the county transportation expenditure plan and upon retirement of all the bonds authorized to be issued pursuant to this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131281.

A county transportation authority may sue and be sued, except as otherwise provided by law, in all actions and proceedings, and in all courts and tribunals of competent jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131282.

All claims for money or damages against a county transportation authority are governed by Division 3.6 (commencing with Section 810) of Title 1 of the Government Code except as provided therein, or by other statutes or regulations expressly applicable thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131283.

A county transportation authority may make contracts and enter into stipulations of any nature to indemnify and hold harmless, to employ labor, and to do all acts necessary and convenient for the full exercise of the powers granted in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131284.

A county transportation authority may contract with any department or agency of the United States, with any public agency, including but not limited to, the department, the commission, or any transit district, county, or city, or with any person upon terms and conditions that the county transportation authority finds is in its best interest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131285.

Contracts for the purchase of supplies, equipment, and materials in excess of seventy-five thousand dollars ($75,000) shall be awarded to the lowest responsible bidder after competitive bidding, except in an emergency declared by the vote of two-thirds of the voting membership of the county transportation authority.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 83, Sec. 5.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

131286.

If, after rejecting bids received under Section 131285, the county transportation authority determines and declares by a two-thirds vote of all of its voting members that, in its opinion, the supplies, equipment, or materials may be purchased at a lower price in the open market, the authority may proceed to purchase these supplies, equipment, or materials in the open market without further observance of the provisions regarding contracts, bids, or advertisement.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Administration of Adopted County Transportation Plan [131300. - 131304.]

131300.

The county transportation authority shall administer the county transportation expenditure plan adopted pursuant to Section 131055.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 301, Sec. 3.   Effective July 14, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------

131301.
